dictionaries/oc_FR/oc_FR.aff
SFX v Y 49
SFX v   i         0            iái
SFX v   i         s            iái
SFX v   iái       iam        iái
SFX v   iái       iatz        iái
SFX v   i          n           iái
SFX v   iái       èm         iái
SFX v   iái       ètz         iái
SFX v   siái      gam      [s]iái
SFX v   siái      gatz       [s]iái
SFX v   viái     gam       [v]iái
SFX v   viái      gatz       [v]iái
SFX v   guiái    gam      guiái
SFX v   guiái    gatz      guiái
SFX v   iái        am         miái
SFX v   iái        atz         miái
SFX v   viái      scam       viviái
SFX v   viái      scatz       viviái
SFX v   siái      jam         vesiái
SFX v   siái      jatz         vesiái
SFX v   iái        gam        [^r]niái
SFX v   iái         gatz       [^r]niái
SFX v   iái         am        niái
SFX v   iái         atz        niái
SFX v   si          sam       tasi
SFX v   si          satz       tasi
SFX v   siái       sam       cosiái
SFX v   siái       satz       cosiái
SFX v   issiái     scam     issiái
SFX v   issiái     scatz     issiái
SFX v  hiái       gam       nhiái
SFX v   hiái       gatz      nhiái
SFX v   iái         gam      liái
SFX v   iái         gatz      liái
SFX v   iái         am        rriái
SFX v   iái         atz        rriái
SFX v   iái         èm       riái
SFX v   iái         ètz       riái
SFX v   iái         am       riái
SFX v   iái         atz       riái
SFX v   iái         am       ziái
SFX v   iái         atz       ziái
SFX v   iái         am       ciái
SFX v   iái         atz       ciái
SFX v   ciái       çam     orciái
SFX v   ciái       çatz     orciái
SFX v   iái         am       [r]diái
SFX v   iái         atz       [r]diái
SFX v   iái        am        [oe]diái
SFX v   iái        atz        [oe]diái

SFX w Y 10
SFX w   i      es           èri
SFX w   ri     t             èri
SFX w   i      em          èri
SFX w   i      etz          èri
SFX w   i      on           èri
SFX w   ri     sse          èri
SFX w   ri     sses        èri
SFX w   ri     ssem       èri
SFX w   ri     ssetz       èri
SFX w   ri     sson        èri

SFX x Y 11
SFX x   ai      às           ai
SFX x   ai      à            ai
SFX x   ai      em         ai
SFX x   ai      etz         ai
SFX x   ai      àn          ai
SFX x   ai      iái          ai
SFX x   ai      iás         ai
SFX x   ai      iá          ai
SFX x   ai      iam        ai
SFX x   ai      iatz        ai
SFX x   ai      ián         ai

SFX y Y 5
SFX y    0      s            ut
SFX y    ut     uda        ut
SFX y    ut     udas       ut
SFX y    ut     edor       ut
SFX y    ut     edoira     ut

SFX z Y 2
SFX z   ar      i        [iu]ar
SFX z   ar      ï        [oe]ar
